Utah statutes.
41-22-7.   Duplicate registration cards and registration stickers.
(1)  If a registration card is lost or destroyed, or if an owner changes the
owner's address from the address shown on the owner's registration card, the
owner shall, within 15 days, apply for a duplicate registration card.
(2)  If a registration sticker is lost, stolen, or becomes illegible, the
owner of the off-highway vehicle shall immediately apply for and obtain a
replacement registration sticker.
